Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 76 Uniform Directed Trust Act [Effective January 1, 2020]
Reporter's Notes to Form 25: See Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-207 (notice of hearing for appointment and methods for service of such notice); Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-208 (persons who must be notified of the hearing). At least 20 days notice of the hearing must be given. Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-207(c)(2).

Form 26.

[Caption]
APPLICATION FOR WRITTEN NOTICE
To:
The undersigned,
, in accordance with Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-209, requests written notice of all hearings on petitions for settlement of accounts, for the sale, mortgage, lease, or exchange of any property of this guardianship estate, for an allowance of any nature payable from the ward's estate, for the investment of funds of the estate, for the removal, suspension, or discharge of the guardian, or for final termination of the guardianship, and any other matter affecting the welfare or care of the incapacitated person or
[his] [her] property.
The requested notice should be sent to the undersigned at the following address:
Date:
,
.
[Signature] [Applicant or Attorney]
[Print Name]
[Address]
[Telephone Number]
[Email Address]

Click to view form.

Reporter's Notes to Form 26: Pursuant to Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-209, an interested party may, in person or by attorney, serve upon the guardian and upon his attorney, and file with the clerk of the court where the proceedings are pending, with a written admission or proof of service, a written request stating that he desires notice of some or all of the matters enumerated in this form. Unless the court directs otherwise, upon filing the request, the person shall be entitled to notice of all such hearings or of such of them as he designates in his request.

Addition to Reporter's Notes (2019): The form was revised to provide for contact information.

Form 27.

[Caption]
GUARDIAN'S BOND
The undersigned,
, as principal, having been appointed guardian of the [person] [estate] [person and estate] of
, an incapacitated person; and
, as surety
, acknowledge themselves to be jointly and severally obligated to the State of Arkansas, for the use and benefit of all persons interested, in the penal sum of
Dollars ($ ), conditioned as follows:
If the undersigned guardian shall well and faithfully account for his guardianship, as by law required, this bond shall become void; otherwise, it will remain in full force and effect.
Date:
,
.
[Signature], as Principal
[Print Name]
[Address]
[Telephone Number]
[Email Address]
[Signature], as Surety
[Print Name]
[Address]
[Telephone Number]
[Email Address]
Approved this date:
,
.
, Clerk.
By:
, Deputy Clerk.
Approved this date:
,
.
, Judge.

Click to view form.

Reporter's Notes to Form 27: See Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-215 (requirement for a bond). For the qualifying affidavit of personal sureties, see Form 7.

Addition to Reporter's Notes (2019): The form was revised to provide for contact information.

Form 28.

[Caption]
ACCEPTANCE OF APPOINTMENT AS GUARDIAN
The undersigned,
, having been appointed guardian of the [person] [estate] [person and estate] of
, an incapacitated person, hereby accepts the appointment.
Date:
,
.
[Signature]
[Print Name]
[Address]
[Telephone Number]
[Email Address]

Click to view form.

Reporter's Notes to Form 28: This form is to be used only when no bond is required of the guardian.

Addition to Reporter's Notes (2019): The form was revised to provide for contact information.

Form 29.

[Caption]
LETTERS OF GUARDIANSHIP OF THE PERSON AND ESTATE
Be It Known:
, whose address is
, having been appointed guardian of the person and estate of
, an incapacitated person, and having qualified as guardian, is hereby authorized to have the care and custody of and exercise control over the incapacitated person and to take possession of and administer the property of the incapacitated person, as authorized by law.
Date:
,
.
, Clerk.
, Deputy Clerk.
(Seal)

Click to view form.

Reporter's Notes to Form 29: This form, prescribed by Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-217, is for a guardianship of both the person and the estate. It should be modified if the guardianship is only of one or the other. If the powers, authorities, and duties of the guardian are limited, the letters of guardianship must clearly state, in bold print, that they are so restricted and the word “limited” must appear in both the title and in the body of the form. For designation of a process agent by a non-resident, see Form 9.

Form 30.

[Caption]
INVENTORY OF WARD'S ESTATE
The undersigned, guardian of the estate of __________________, an incapacitated person, states on oath that to the best of my knowledge and belief, the following is a complete and accurate inventory of all property owned by the ward at the time of my appointment as such guardian, and that the amount set opposite each item of property is its fair market value at the time it came under my control as guardian:
REAL ESTATE
Legal Description and Extent of Ward's Interest Encumbrances, Liens, Etc., and Net Value Respective Amounts Thereof $
$
Total value of real estate: $
PERSONAL PROPERTY
Household Goods and Personal Effects
[This list should include, but not be limited to, furniture, household and yard equipment, clothing, jewelry, etc.]
Description Encumbrances, Liens, etc., and Net Value Respective Amounts Thereof $
$
Other Tangible Personal Property
[This list should include, but not be limited to, automobiles and other motor vehicles, farm equipment, livestock, agricultural products, stocks of merchandise, any going business enterprise or interest therein, etc.]
Description Encumbrances, Liens, etc., and Net Value Respective Amounts Thereof $
$
Intangible Personal Property
[List separately in detail: cash on hand; money on deposit, stating names and addresses of depositories; bonds, stating names of issuers, interest rates, classes, maturity dates, serial numbers, face amounts, and dates to which interest is paid; corporate stocks, stating certificate numbers, names of issuers, classes, and number of shares; notes receivable, stating the names and addresses of makers, dates, amounts, interest rates, and dates to which interest paid, balances due, maturities, and security, if any; accounts receivable, stating names of debtors, dates of last items and balances due; and other intangibles, describing in detail.]
Description Encumbrances, Liens, etc., and Net Value Respective Amounts Thereof $
$
Total value of personal property: $
SUMMARY
Total real property: $
Total personal property: $
Total estate: $
The undersigned is not indebted or obligated to the ward except as stated herein.
Date:
,
.
[Signature]
[Print Name]
[Address]
[Telephone Number]
[Email Address]
[Affidavit]

Click to view form.

Reporter's Notes to Form 30: Paragraph (a) of Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-321 provides that the inventory is subject to the same requirements for the inventory of a decedent's estate. See Ark. Code Ann. §28-49-110. Among those requirements is an affidavit.

Addition to Reporter's Notes (2019): The form was revised to provide for contact information.

Form 31.

[Caption]
ACCOUNTING BY GUARDIAN
respectfully submits to the court [his] [her] account as guardian of the estate of
for the period beginning on [date] and ending on [date]. This account is submitted because [insert the occasion for filing of account as set forth in Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-320].
1. Charges to accountant: [If this is the first account, the first item should be the value of the estate as reflected by the inventory. If a subsequent account, the first item should be the balance shown on the previous account. Thereafter list separately and describe in detail (a) additional property received by accountant; (b) all income; and (c) gains from the sale, conveyance or other disposition of any property received by the accountant during the accounting period. Show the date of each transaction.]
Total charges to accountant: $
2. Credits, other than payments to distributees, to which accountant is entitled: [List separately (a) all disbursements, other than payments to distributees, and (b) all losses sustained on sales, conveyances or other dispositions of any property, describing each item in full. Show the date of each transaction.]
Total: $
3. Credits for money paid or assets delivered to distributees: [Itemize each disbursement of cash and describe in detail other assets delivered, showing opposite each asset the amount at which its value was estimated in the inventory or, if purchased by the accountant, its cost. Show the date of each transaction.]
Total: $
SUMMARY OF ACCOUNT
Charges to accountant: $
Credits as per paragraph 2: $
Credits as per paragraph 3: $
Total Credits: $
Balance remaining in hands of accountant: $
4. Description of balance remaining in hands of accountant: [List separately and describe in detail each item of property remaining in the accountant's hands, showing the inventory value or cost of each.]
5. Changes in form of assets not affecting balance: [List separately and describe in detail all changes in the form of assets resulting from collections or sales at inventory or cost value and other such transactions. Show the date of each transaction.]
6. All outstanding liabilities of the estate of which accountant has knowledge are:
Total Liabilities: $
Vouchers evidencing cash disbursements and receipts evidencing other assets delivered for which accountant has taken credit are attached to this account.
THEREFORE, having fully accounted for the administration of this estate for the period set out above, accountant requests that, after proper advertisement and notice, if any, required by the law or by the court, this account be examined, approved, and confirmed by the court, and that accountant be allowed the sum of $
as [his] [her] fee for services rendered during the period covered by this account.
Date:
,
.
[Signature]
[Print Name]
[Address]
[Telephone Number]
[Email Address]
[Affidavit]

Click to view form.

Reporter's Notes to Form 31: Pursuant to Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-320, a guardian of the estate must file with the court annually, within 60 days after the anniversary date of his or her appointment and also within 60 days after termination of his or her guardianship, a written verified accounting. Notice of hearing of every accounting must be given to the same persons in the same manner as required in connection with the petition to appoint the guardian, except that the court may dispense with notice to a mentally incompetent ward upon a satisfactory showing that such notice would be detrimental to his or her well-being.

Addition to Reporter's Notes (2019): The form was revised to provide for contact information.

Form 32.

[Caption]
ANNUAL REPORT OF GUARDIAN
, the duly appointed, qualified, and acting guardian of
, an incapacitated person, submits this annual report to the court in accordance with Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-322.
The current mental, physical, and social condition of the incapacitated person is: [Provide a summary.]
The present living arrangements of the incapacitated person are: [Describe those arrangements.]
The need for continued guardianship services is: [State whether there is a need for such services.]
Submitted with this annual report is the petitioner's accounting of the guardianship estate for the period beginning on [date] and ending on [date].
Date:
,
.
[Signature]
[Print Name]
[Address]
[Telephone Number]
[Email Address]

Click to view form.

Reporter's Notes to Form 32: All guardians must file an annual report with the court, setting forth the matters reflected in this form. See Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-322. Any other information which is requested by the court or is necessary in the opinion of the guardian must also be included.

Addition to Reporter's Notes (2019): The form was revised to provide for contact information.

Form 33.

[Caption]
AGREEMENT OF DEPOSITORY
The undersigned, being [a bank in Arkansas insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation] [a savings and loan association in Arkansas insured by the Federal Savings & Loan Association Corporation] [a credit union in Arkansas insured by the National Credit Union Administration], received on deposit from
, as guardian of the estate of
, an incapacitated person, the sum of
Dollars ($
) in cash on
[date] and agrees not to permit any withdrawal from these funds unless authorized by order of this court.
Date:
,
.
[Signature] [Authorized Officer or
Agent of Depository]
[Print Name]
[Address]
[Telephone Number]
[Email Address]

Click to view form.

Reporter's Notes to Form 33: By statute, the court may dispense with a bond for the guardian when the entire guardianship is in cash deposited on interest in any of the institutions identified in the form, provided that the value of the estate so deposited is not greater than the maximum amount of insurance provided by law for a single depositor. Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-215(e). This form must be executed on behalf of the depository and filed with the probate clerk. For an enumeration of the types of authorized investments for guardianship funds, see Ark. Code Ann. §28-65-311.”

Addition to Reporter's Notes (2019): The form was revised to provide for contact information.